Wyoming, session 2025, HB0050.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-627(c) is amended to read:

9-1-627. Authority to compile, disseminate and
exchange information; immunity; access to information
limited; security precautions.

(c) Access to criminal identification and
intelligence information is available to law enforcement
agencies, the state board of parole and department of
HB0050

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0123
corrections as provided by W.S. 7-13-401 through 7-13-411,
the office of homeland security for the purposes provided
by W.S. 19-13-105, any agency designated for the purpose
provided by W.S. 14-6-227 and the department of family
services. Each agency which has that information shall take
reasonable security precautions to prevent unauthorized
persons from gaining access to it in accordance with rules
and procedures established by the division. The rules and
procedures may be varied between agencies, depending upon
the division's determination of the agency's use of the
criminal identification and intelligence information and
the adequacy of the agency's security of the information
provided by the division under this section.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0050